Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.040

Prerequisites to marketing orders—Director's duties.

Marketing orders and orders modifying or terminating existing marketing orders shall be promulgated by the director only after the director has done the following:

(1) Received a petition as provided for in RCW 15.66.050;

(2) Given notice of hearing as provided for in RCW 15.66.060;

(3) Conducted a hearing as provided for in RCW 15.66.070;

(4) Made findings and decision as provided for in RCW 15.66.080;

(5) Determined assent of affected producers as provided for in RCW 15.66.090.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.66.040. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 4.]